Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.251

Transfer of transferable interest.

(1) A transfer, in whole or in part, of a transferable interest:

(a) Is permissible; and

(b) Does not, as against the members or the limited liability company, entitle the transferee to participate in the management of the limited liability company's activities, to require access to information concerning the limited liability company's transactions except as provided in subsection (5) of this section or in RCW 25.15.136(11), or to obtain access to information to which a member is otherwise entitled pursuant to RCW 25.15.136 or the limited liability company's other records.

(2) A transfer of a transferable interest entitles the transferee to receive distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled, to the extent transferred.

(3) Upon transfer of less than the transferor's entire transferable interest in the limited liability company, the transferor retains the rights, duties, and obligations of the transferor immediately prior to the transfer other than the transferable interest transferred.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, a transferee that becomes a member with respect to a transferable interest is liable for the transferor's obligations with respect to the transferable interest. Except to the extent such liabilities are assumed by agreement:

(a) Until a transferee of a transferable interest becomes a member with respect to the transferable interest, the transferee has no liability as a member solely as a result of the transfer; and

(b) A transferee is not obligated for liabilities associated with a transferable interest that are unknown to the transferee at the time the transferee becomes a member.

(5) In a dissolution and winding up, a transferee is entitled to an account of the limited liability company's transactions only from the date of dissolution.

(6) For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) The pledge of, or granting of a security interest, lien, or other encumbrance in or against, any or all of a transferable interest is not a transfer of the transferable interest, but a foreclosure or execution sale or exercise of similar rights with respect to any or all of transferable interest is a transfer of the transferable interest to the transferee pursuant to such foreclosure or execution sale or exercise of similar rights.

(b) Where a transferable interest is held in a trust or estate, or is held by a trustee, personal representative, or other fiduciary, the transfer of the transferable interest, whether to a beneficiary of the trust or estate or otherwise, is a transfer of such transferable interest, but the mere substitution or replacement of the trustee, personal representative, or other fiduciary does not constitute a transfer of such transferable interest.

[ 2015 c 188 s 49.]